latvian.utf8.aff
#iebĀzti III konjugĀcijas am (tipa [^ĀĒĪ]t
flag *(:
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMA
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMĀ
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAI
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAIS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAJĀ
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAJAI
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAJAM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAJĀM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAJĀS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAJIEM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAJOS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMĀM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMAS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMĀS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMI
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMIE
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMIEM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMO
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMOS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMU
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,AMUS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMA
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMU
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMĀ
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAI
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMI
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMIEM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMUS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMOS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMĀM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMĀS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAIS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAJAM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMO
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAJĀ
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAJAI
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMIE
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAJIEM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAJOS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAJĀM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,ĀMAJĀS
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMS
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMA
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAM
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMU
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMĀ
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAS
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAI
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMI
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMIEM
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMUS
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMOS
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMĀM
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMĀS
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAIS
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAJAM
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMO
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAJĀ
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAJAI
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMIE
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAJIEM
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAJOS
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAJĀM
   [C][Ī]T    > -CĪT,KĀMAJĀS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMA
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMU
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMĀ
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAI
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMI
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMIEM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMUS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMOS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMĀM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMĀS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAIS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAJAM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMO
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAJĀ
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAJAI
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMIE
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAJIEM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAJOS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAJĀM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,ĀMAJĀS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMA
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMU
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMĀ
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAI
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMI
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMIEM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMUS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMOS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMĀM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMĀS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAIS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAJAM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMO
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAJĀ
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAJAI
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMIE
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAJIEM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAJOS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAJĀM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GĀMAJĀS
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMS
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMA
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMĀ
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAI
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAIS
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAJĀ
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAJAI
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAJAM
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAJĀM
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAJĀS
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAJIEM
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAJOS
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAM
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMĀM
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMAS
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMĀS
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMI
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMIE
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMIEM
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMO
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMOS
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMU
   [^T][Ē]T    > -ĒT,AMUS
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMS
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMA
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMĀ
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAI
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAIS
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAJĀ
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAJAI
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAJAM
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAJĀM
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAJĀS
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAJIEM
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAJOS
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAM
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMĀM
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMAS
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMĀS
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMI
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMIE
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMIEM
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMO
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMOS
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMU
   [T][Ē]T    > -TĒT,TAMUS
   [Ā]T    > -T,MS
   [Ā]T    > -T,MA
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAM
   [Ā]T    > -T,MU
   [Ā]T    > -T,MĀ
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAS
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAI
   [Ā]T    > -T,MI
   [Ā]T    > -T,MIEM
   [Ā]T    > -T,MUS
   [Ā]T    > -T,MOS
   [Ā]T    > -T,MĀM
   [Ā]T    > -T,MĀS
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAIS
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAJAM
   [Ā]T    > -T,MO
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAJĀ
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAJAI
   [Ā]T    > -T,MIE
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAJIEM
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAJOS
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAJĀM
   [Ā]T    > -T,MAJĀS


flag *^:
   T    > -T,STOŠS
   T    > -T,STOŠA
   T    > -T,STOŠAM
   T    > -T,STOŠU
   T    > -T,STOŠĀ
   T    > -T,STOŠAS
   T    > -T,STOŠAI
   T    > -T,STOŠI
   T    > -T,STOŠIEM
   T    > -T,STOŠUS
   T    > -T,STOŠOS
   T    > -T,STOŠĀM
   T    > -T,STOŠĀS
   T    > -T,STOŠAIS
   T    > -T,STOŠAJAM
   T    > -T,STOŠO
   T    > -T,STOŠAJĀ
   T    > -T,STOŠAJAI
   T    > -T,STOŠIE
   T    > -T,STOŠAJIEM
   T    > -T,STOŠAJOS
   T    > -T,STOŠAJĀM
   T    > -T,STOŠAJĀS

flag *$:
   T    > -T,JOŠS
   T    > -T,JOŠA
   T    > -T,JOŠAM
   T    > -T,JOŠU
   T    > -T,JOŠĀ
   T    > -T,JOŠAS
   T    > -T,JOŠAI
   T    > -T,JOŠI
   T    > -T,JOŠIEM
   T    > -T,JOŠUS
   T    > -T,JOŠOS
   T    > -T,JOŠĀM
   T    > -T,JOŠĀS
   T    > -T,JOŠAIS
   T    > -T,JOŠAJAM
   T    > -T,JOŠO
   T    > -T,JOŠAJĀ
   T    > -T,JOŠAJAI
   T    > -T,JOŠIE
   T    > -T,JOŠAJIEM
   T    > -T,JOŠAJOS
   T    > -T,JOŠAJĀM
   T    > -T,JOŠAJĀS

flag *h:
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠA
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠĀ
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAI
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAIS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAJĀ
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAJAI
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAJAM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAJĀM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAJĀS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAJIEM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAJOS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠĀM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠAS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠĀS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠI
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠIE
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠIEM
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠO
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠOS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠS
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠU
   [^ĀĒĪ]T    > -T,OŠUS
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠA
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠĀ
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAI
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAIS
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAJĀ
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAJAI
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAJAM
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAJĀM
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAJĀS
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAJIEM
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAJOS
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAM
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠĀM
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠAS
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠĀS
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠI
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠIE
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠIEM
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠO
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠOS
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠS
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠU
   [Ē]T    > -ĒT,OŠUS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠA
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠĀ
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAI
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAIS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAJĀ
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAJAI
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAJAM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAJĀM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAJĀS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAJIEM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAJOS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠĀM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠAS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠĀS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠI
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠIE
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠIEM
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠO
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠOS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠS
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠU
   [^CZ][Ī]T    > -ĪT,OŠUS
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠA
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠĀ
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAI
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAIS
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAJĀ
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAJAI
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAJAM
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAJĀM
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAJĀS
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAJIEM
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAJOS
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAM
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠĀM
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠAS
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠĀS
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠI
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠIE
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠIEM
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠO
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠOS
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠS
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠU
   [C]ĪT    > -CĪT,KOŠUS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠA
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠĀ
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAI
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAIS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAJĀ
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAJAI
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAJAM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAJĀM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAJĀS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAJIEM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAJOS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠĀM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠAS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠĀS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠI
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠIE
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠIEM
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠO
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠOS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠS
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠU
   [^D]ZĪT    > -ĪT,OŠUS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠA
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠĀ
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAI
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAIS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAJĀ
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAJAI
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAJAM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAJĀM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAJĀS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAJIEM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAJOS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠĀM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠAS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠĀS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠI
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠIE
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠIEM
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠO
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠOS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠS
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠU
   [D]ZĪT    > -DZĪT,GOŠUS
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠA
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠĀ
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAI
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAIS
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAJĀ
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAJAI
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAJAM
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAJĀM
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAJĀS
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAJIEM
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAJOS
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAM
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠĀM
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠAS
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠĀS
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠI
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠIE
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠIEM
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠO
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠOS
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠS
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠU
   [Ā]T    > -ĀT,OŠUS
